California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(5) The total amount of property taxes allocated to special districts by the county auditor as a result of paragraph (4) shall be subtracted from the amount of property tax revenues not allocated to special districts by the county auditor as a result of paragraph (3) to determine the amount to be deposited in the Education Revenue Augmentation Fund as specified in subdivision (d).

(6) On or before September 30, 1993, the county auditor shall notify the Director of Finance of the net amount determined for special districts pursuant to paragraph (5).

(d) (1) The amount of property tax revenues not allocated to the county, city and county, cities within the county, and special districts as a result of the reductions required by subdivisions (a), (b),
 and (c) shall instead be deposited in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund established in each county or city and county pursuant to Section 97.2. The amount of revenue in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund, derived from whatever source, shall be allocated pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) to school districts and county offices of education, in total, and to community college districts, in total, in the same proportion that property tax revenues were distributed to school districts and county offices of education, in total, and community college districts, in total, during the 1992–93 fiscal year.

(2) The county auditor shall, based on information provided by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to this paragraph, allocate that proportion of the revenue in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund to be allocated to school
 districts and county offices of education only to those school districts and county offices of education within the county that are not excess tax school entities, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 95. The county superintendent of schools shall determine the amount to be allocated to each school district in inverse proportion to the amounts of property tax revenue per average daily attendance in each school district. For each county office of education, the allocation shall be made based on the historical split of base property tax revenue between the county office of education and school districts within the county. In no event shall any additional money be allocated from the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund to a school district or county office of education upon that district or county office of education becoming an excess tax school entity. If, after determining the amount to be
 allocated to each school district and county office of education, the county superintendent of schools determines there are still additional funds to be allocated, the county superintendent of schools shall determine the remainder to be allocated in inverse proportion to the amounts of property tax revenue, excluding Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund moneys, per average daily attendance in each remaining school district, and on the basis of the historical split described above for each county office of education that is not an excess tax school entity, until all funds that would not result in a school district or county office of education becoming an excess tax school entity are allocated. The county superintendent of schools may determine the amounts to be allocated between each school district and county office of education to ensure that all funds that would not result in a school district
 or county office of education becoming an excess tax school entity are allocated.

(3) The county auditor shall, based on information provided by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges pursuant to this paragraph, allocate that proportion of the revenue in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund to be allocated to community college districts only to those community college districts within the county that are not excess tax school entities, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 95. The chancellor shall determine the amount to be allocated to each community college district in inverse proportion to the amounts of property tax revenue per funded full-time equivalent student in each community college district. In no event shall any additional money be allocated from the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund to a community college
 district upon that district becoming an excess tax school entity.

(4) (A) If, after making the allocation required pursuant to paragraph (2), the auditor determines that there are still additional funds to be allocated, the auditor shall allocate those excess funds pursuant to paragraph (3). If, after making the allocation pursuant to paragraph (3), the auditor determines that there are still additional funds to be allocated, the auditor shall allocate those excess funds pursuant to paragraph (2). If, after determining the amount to be allocated to each community college district, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges determines that there are still additional funds to be allocated, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall determine the remainder to be allocated to each community college
 district in inverse proportion to the amounts of property tax revenue, excluding Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund moneys, per funded full-time equivalent student in each remaining community college district that is not an excess tax school entity until all funds that would not result in a community college district becoming an excess tax school entity are allocated.

(B) (i) (I) For the 1995–96 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, if, after making the allocations pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) and subparagraph (A), the auditor determines that there are still additional funds to be allocated, the auditor shall, subject to clauses (ii) and (iii), allocate those excess funds to the county superintendent of schools. Funds allocated pursuant to this subclause shall be counted as property
 tax revenues for special education programs in augmentation of the amount calculated pursuant to Section 2572 of the Education Code, to the extent that those property tax revenues offset state aid for county offices of education and school districts within the county pursuant to Section 56836.15 of the Education Code.

(II) For the 2007–08 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, both of the following apply:

(ia) In allocating the revenues described in subclause (I), the auditor shall apportion funds to the appropriate special education local plan area to cover the amount determined in Section 56836.173 of the Education Code.

(ib) Except as otherwise provided by sub-subclause (ia), property tax
 revenues described in subclause (I) shall not be apportioned to special education programs funded pursuant to Section 56836.173 of the Education Code.

(III) If, for the 2000–01 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter, any additional revenues remain after the implementation of subclauses (I) and (II), the auditor shall allocate those remaining revenues among the county, cities, and special districts in proportion to the amounts of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise required to be shifted from those local agencies to the county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the relevant fiscal year.

(IV) A county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund shall not be required to provide funding for special education programs funded pursuant to Section 56836.173 of the Education
 Code or any predecessor to that section for a fiscal year before the 2007–08 fiscal year that it has not already provided for these programs before the beginning of the 2007–08 fiscal year.

(ii) For the 1995–96 fiscal year only, clause (i) shall not apply to the County of Mono and the amount allocated pursuant to clause (i) in the County of Marin shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(iii) For the 1996–97 fiscal year only, the total amount of funds allocated by the auditor pursuant to clause (i) and clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 shall not exceed that portion of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) that corresponds to the county’s proportionate share of all moneys allocated pursuant to clause (i)
 and clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 for the 1995–96 fiscal year. Upon the request of the auditor, the Department of Finance shall provide to the auditor all information in the department’s possession that is necessary for the auditor to comply with this clause.

(iv) Notwithstanding clause (i) of this subparagraph, for the 1999–2000 fiscal year only, if, after making the allocations pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) and subparagraph (A), the auditor determines that there are still additional funds to be allocated, the auditor shall allocate the funds to the county, cities, and special districts in proportion to the amounts of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise required to be shifted from those local agencies to the county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the relevant
 fiscal year. The amount allocated pursuant to this clause shall not exceed eight million two hundred thirty-nine thousand dollars ($8,239,000), as appropriated in Item 6110-250-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 1999 (Chapter 50, Statutes of 1999).

(C) For purposes of allocating the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the 1996–97 fiscal year, the auditor shall, after making the allocations for special education programs, if any, required by subparagraph (B), allocate all remaining funds among the county, cities, and special districts in proportion to the amounts of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise required to be shifted from those local agencies to the county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the relevant fiscal year. For purposes of ad valorem property tax revenue allocations for the 1997–98 fiscal year
 and each fiscal year thereafter, no amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to the county, a city, or a special district pursuant to this subparagraph shall be deemed to be an amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to that local agency in the prior fiscal year.

(5) For purposes of allocations made pursuant to Section 96.1 for the 1994–95 fiscal year, the amounts allocated from the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to this subdivision, other than those amounts deposited in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to any provision of the Health and Safety Code, shall be deemed property tax revenue allocated to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund in the prior fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 85.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

97.31.

(a) (1) The Director of Finance shall direct the county auditor to reduce, in the 1993–94 fiscal year, the amount of the transfer to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund determined pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 97.3 for any eligible county in accordance with subdivision (b) of this section, and also shall direct the county auditor to reduce, in the 1993–94 fiscal year, the amount of that transfer for certain counties in accordance with subdivision (c). The total amount of the reductions for
 all counties made for the 1993–94 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000). For the 1994–95 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, ad valorem property tax revenue allocations made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 96.1 shall fully incorporate the adjustments required by this section.

(2) For purposes of this section, an “eligible county” is a county with a population of less than 350,000, as reported in the 1990 federal census that had a fire element of the tax bill in 1977–78, that continues to fund some portion of those costs from the county general fund in 1993–94, and that provides these services in the same manner as a special district less than countywide and has so indicated in the Controller’s Report on Financial Transactions Concerning Counties.

(b) (1) For each eligible county, the county
 auditor may submit the following information to the Director of Finance not later than November 1, 1993:

(A) The amount of property tax allocated to the county fire district in the 1977–78 fiscal year.

(B) The amount allocated from the county budget to the county fire district in the 1978–79 fiscal year.

(C) The amount of property tax reduction for the county fire district attributable to the passage of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution by the voters in the primary election in June 1978.

(D) The amount of money allocated from the county budget to the county fire district in the 1993–94 fiscal year.

(E) The amount allocated to the county fire district
 from the Special District Augmentation Fund in the 1992–93 fiscal year.

(2) For each eligible county that submits to the Director of Finance by November 1, 1993, the information described in paragraph (1), the Director of Finance shall make the following calculations:

(A) Multiply the amount of property tax allocated to the county fire district in the 1977–78 fiscal year by the change in the value of the property tax base for the county from the 1977–78 fiscal year to the 1978–79 fiscal year.

(B) Subtract the amount reported pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) from the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(C) Multiply the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (B) by an amount determined by the Director of Finance to be the
 change in assessed value for the county from the 1978–79 fiscal year to the 1993–94 fiscal year.

(D) Multiply the amount reported pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) by 1.038.

(E) Add the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (C) to the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (D).

(F) Subtract the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (E) from the amount reported pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1).

(3) The Director of Finance shall determine the sum of all the amounts determined pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2).

(4) If the sum determined pursuant to paragraph (3) is greater than two million dollars ($2,000,000), then the Director of Finance
 shall proportionately reduce the amount for each county so that the total of the amounts for all counties does not exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000). If the sum determined pursuant to subdivision (e) does not exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000), then the Director of Finance shall not reduce the amount determined for each county.

(5) The Director of Finance shall by January 15, 1994, notify each county of its reduction in the amount to be transferred to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 97.3. The maximum amount of the reduction that may be authorized pursuant to this subdivision is one-half the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2).

(c) The amount to be transferred from a county to an Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 97.3 shall be reduced by one hundred
 thousand dollars ($100,000) for the County of Madera and by two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for the County of Tulare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211, Sec. 20.   Effective August 5, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

97.313.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for the 1995–96 fiscal year only, the auditor of any qualified county shall, upon being directed by the board of supervisors, increase the amount of property tax revenue allocated to that county by an amount of property tax revenue, not to exceed one million five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,550,000), that is attributable to the difference between the following amounts:

(1) The amount of the reduction that would
 have been determined by the Director of Finance for the qualified county pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 97.31 in the absence of the two million dollar ($2,000,000) limitation of subdivision (a) and paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of that section, and the maximum limitation of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of that same section.

(2) The amount of the reduction that was determined by the Director of Finance for the qualified county pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 97.31.

If the board of supervisors directs the auditor, pursuant to this subdivision, to increase the amount of the property tax revenue allocation of the county, the board shall also direct the auditor to commensurately reduce the amount of the property tax revenue allocation to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund. The county shall expend any additional amount of property tax revenue that it receives pursuant to this
 subdivision solely for the purpose of funding public safety services.

(b) The Director of Finance shall determine for each qualified county the difference described in subdivision (a), and shall as soon as reasonably possible after the effective date of the act adding this section, notify the board of supervisors of each qualified county in writing of the amount of the difference calculated for that county.

(c) For purposes of this section, “qualified county” means an “eligible county,” as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 97.31, that was subject to the reduction required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of that same section.

(d) Except as otherwise required by law, the county auditor of a qualified county shall allocate property tax revenues for the 1996–97 fiscal year and each fiscal year
 thereafter in those amounts that fully reflect, as otherwise required by this chapter, any increases or reductions in allocations that are directed by the board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 319.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

97.32.

Notwithstanding Section 97.3, a special district does not include, for purposes of the reductions required by that section, a memorial district formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1170) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Military and Veteran’s Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

97.33.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for the 1993–94 fiscal year, the amounts of property tax revenue that are required to be shifted pursuant to Section 97.3 from a city described in the second clause of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 95 or a city described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16700 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and from the county in which those cities are located, to the Educational Relief Augmentation Fund, shall each be reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the property
 tax revenue loss incurred by the city or county as a result of the Oakland/Berkeley fire that occurred in October 1991. The auditor shall certify to the Department of Finance the amount of the property tax revenue loss for each city and the county as a result of those properties that were reassessed as a result of that fire. The property tax revenue loss shall be the difference between the property tax revenues, including property tax revenue attributable to tax rates levied pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, that would have been derived based on the original assessed value of those properties for the 1991–92 fiscal year prior to any reassessment for disaster relief, increased by 2 percent, and the property tax revenues derived from the assessed value of those properties for the 1992–93 fiscal year.

(b) In each of the 1994–95, 1995–96, and 1996–97 fiscal years, for
 the county and cities described in subdivision (a), one-third of the adjustments made pursuant to subdivision (a) for each described city and the county shall be added to the amount of property tax revenue deemed allocated to each city and the county in the prior fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

97.34.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the amount of the revenue reduction resulting from the application of subdivision (c) of Section 97.2 to an amount equal to the amount of the water quality control compliance costs of a qualified special district for the 1992–93 fiscal year shall, for purposes of property tax revenue allocations for the 1993–94 fiscal year, be added to the amount of property tax revenue deemed allocated to that district in the 1992–93 fiscal year. The water quality control compliance costs of a qualified
 special district for the relevant fiscal year shall also be deducted from the amount of property tax revenue subject to reduction with respect to that district under Section 97.3 for the 1993–94 fiscal year, and under any statute with respect to any subsequent fiscal year that would reduce the amount of property tax revenue deemed allocated in the prior fiscal year to that district for purposes of increasing the amount of property tax revenue to be allocated to another jurisdiction.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) A “qualified special district” means any special district that is required to comply with Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 13950) of Division 7 of the Water Code.

(2) “Water quality control compliance costs” mean those costs, including, but not limited to, reserves for nongrowth facility
 augmentation and replacement and environmental protection, that are determined by the county auditor in accordance with subdivision (a) to have been incurred by a qualified special district in complying with Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 13950) of Division 7 of the Water Code.

(c) The auditor may assess each qualified special district its share of the auditor’s actual and reasonable costs of complying with this section. For purposes of this subdivision, each share of costs shall be determined in accordance with that district’s proportional share of the total amount of water quality control compliance costs determined by the auditor for purposes of this section for each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

97.35.

Notwithstanding Section 97.3, the amount of property tax revenues of a community service district that is subject to reduction pursuant to that section shall not include those property tax revenues, up to the amount of ninety thousand dollars ($90,000), that are allocated by that district to “police protection and personal safety” activities, as indicated in the 1989–90 edition of the State Controller’s Report on the Financial Transactions of Special Districts in California.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

97.36.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for the designated fiscal year, the amount of the revenue allocation reduction with respect to a qualified county that is attributable in that fiscal year to the reduction determined for that county for the 1993–94 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 97.3 or its predecessor section shall be reduced by the amount of any increased revenues, allocated in the designated fiscal year in that county to a “qualifying school entity” as defined in paragraph (5) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 97.3 or its predecessor section, that would not have been so allocated but for that county being a qualified county. 

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) A “qualified county” means a county or city or county that has first implemented for the 1994–95 or any subsequent fiscal year the alternative procedure for the distribution of property tax levies that is authorized by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4701) of Part 8.

(2) For purposes of this section,“designated fiscal year” means the fiscal year in which the relevant qualified county first implemented the alternative method for the distribution of property tax levies that is authorized by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4701) of Part 8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

97.361.

Any reduction amount determined for a county pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 97.36 that is not applied to the benefit of that county in that county’s designated fiscal year, as defined in Section 97.36, may not be so applied in a later fiscal year, regardless of any increase in the amount of revenues allocated in that county to qualifying school entities as a result of the county’s adoption of the alternate procedure for the distribution of property tax levies authorized by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4701) of Part 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 528, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

97.37.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for the 1994–95 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount of property tax revenue deemed allocated in the prior fiscal year to a county free library system, or a library established as an independent special district, shall not be reduced for purposes of increasing the amount of property tax revenue to be allocated to another jurisdiction. This section does not apply to any adjustments in property tax allocations made pursuant to Section 19116 of the Education Code.

(b) (1) This section shall not be construed to preclude allocations of ad valorem property tax revenue to a county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund, rather than to a county free library system or a library established as an independent special district, that are required by the application to a library system or library district, as so described, of Sections 97.2 and 97.3. The Legislature finds and declares that this paragraph does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(2) This section does not apply to any adjustments in property tax allocations made pursuant to Section 19116 of the Education Code.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for those county free library systems from which the auditor had not shifted ad
 valorem property tax revenue to an Education Revenue Augmentation Fund as of January 1, 1996, all of the following shall apply:

(A) No allocation of ad valorem property tax revenue to a county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund shall be required from a county free library system that did not levy a property tax rate separate from the property tax rate of the county for the 1975–76, 1976–77, and 1977–78 fiscal years, was not entitled to an allocation of property tax revenue for the 1978–79 and 1979–80 fiscal years, and did not receive state assistance payments pursuant to Section 16260, 26912, or 26912.1 of the Government Code.

(B) No allocation of ad valorem property tax revenue to a county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund shall be required from a county free library system that, for the 1977–78 fiscal year, was organized as a joint powers agency pursuant to Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(C) A county free library system established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 19100) of Chapter 6 of Part 11 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, for which a separate property tax rate was levied in the 1977–78 fiscal year, shall be considered a special district. However, any county free library system that was not actually allocated property tax revenues pursuant to this chapter for the 1992–93 fiscal year and any portion of the 1993–94 fiscal year shall not be considered a special district for any purpose in the 1992–93 fiscal year and that portion of the 1993–94 fiscal year for which those revenues were not allocated.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that this subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   Effective October 8, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

97.38.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 , for the County of Marin , commencing with the 1993–94 fiscal year, and for the County of Mono, commencing with the 1994-95 fiscal year, if, after making the allocations pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 as required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 and after making the allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3, the auditor determines that each community college
 district located entirely within that county is an excess school tax entity as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 95, the auditor shall then apply any remaining funds to decrease the amounts of those reductions calculated pursuant to Section 97.3 with respect to the county, cities, and special districts in proportion to the amount of the reduction otherwise calculated under Section 97.3 for each of those agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 500, Sec. 3.   Effective October 4, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

97.39.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount of each allocation that was made to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund of the County of Santa Clara in any fiscal year, up to and including the 1996–97 fiscal year, as the result of a reduction amount calculated pursuant to Section 97.2 or 97.3 for the Los Altos County Fire Protection District, the Santa Clara County Central Fire Protection District, the Saratoga Fire Protection District, or the South Santa Clara County Fire District, shall be deemed correct.

(b) No reduction or correction may be made, in response to a calculation error, to an allocation that was made to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund of the County of Santa Clara in any fiscal year, up to and including the 1996–97 fiscal year, as the result of a reduction amount calculated pursuant to Section 97.2 or 97.3 for a County of Santa Clara fire district listed in subdivision (a). However, in the 1997–98 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, each allocation that is made to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund of the County of Santa Clara as the result of a reduction amount calculated pursuant to Section 97.2 or 97.3 for a County of Santa Clara fire district listed in subdivision (a) shall be made in that amount that fully reflects any reduction or correction that would be required to be made to a corresponding allocation in a prior fiscal year in the absence of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 567, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

97.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 97.2 or 97.3 or any other provision of this chapter, in implementing the changes in allocations of property tax revenues required by Sections 97, 97.1, 97.2, and 97.3, the county auditor may elect to determine and give effect to the changes in allocations of property tax revenues required by Sections 97, 97.1, 97.2, and 97.3 on a countywide, rather than tax rate area, basis. If the county auditor so elects, he or she shall ensure adequate recognition of year-to-year revenue growth so that the results of changes
 implemented on a countywide basis do not differ materially from the results which would be obtained from the use of a tax rate area basis.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 1992–93 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, in any county in which property tax increment revenues are allocated to a redevelopment agency pursuant to Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code, the county auditor shall deposit in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund an amount that is equal to the total amount of revenues that would be so deposited pursuant to Sections 97, 97.1, 97.2, and 97.3 if no reduction were made in that amount of revenues for purposes of allocations to a redevelopment agency pursuant to Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code. Those revenues deposited in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund in accordance with this paragraph shall be allocated or transferred only to school
 districts, county offices of education, or community college districts, in accordance with subdivision (d) of either Section 97.2 or 97.3.

(2) The deposit of property tax revenue in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund in accordance with paragraph (1) shall not reduce or otherwise affect the amount of property tax revenue to be allocated to a redevelopment agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code, and any additional amount required to be allocated to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deducted from those amounts allocated to the county, cities, and special districts with respect to each tax rate area in which property tax increment revenues are allocated to a redevelopment agency. These reductions shall be made in proportion to the total amount of the reductions required with respect to the county and each city and special district in each of these
 redevelopment agency tax rate areas under Sections 97, 97.1, 97.2, and 97.3.

(3) This subdivision shall not require the modification of any property tax revenue allocation that was made by the county auditor for the 1992–93 fiscal year in a manner inconsistent with paragraph (1) or (2), if that allocation was implemented on or before June 30, 1993. However, property tax revenue allocations made in the 1993–94 fiscal year and any fiscal year thereafter shall be determined by the county auditor as if the allocations made for the 1992–93 fiscal year had been made in a manner consistent with paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

97.401.

Commencing February 1, 2012, the county auditor shall make the calculations required by Section 97.4 based on the amount deposited on behalf of each former redevelopment agency into the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 34182 of the Health and Safety Code. The calculations required by Section 97.4 shall result in cities, counties, and special districts annually remitting
 to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund the same amounts they would have remitted but for the operation of Part 1.8 (commencing with Section 34161) and Part 1.85 (commencing with Section 34170) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 8.   (AB 26 1x)   Effective June 29, 2011.    Text reformed per California Redevelopment Assn. v. Matosantos (2011) 53 Cal.4th 231.)
-------------------------------------------

97.41.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, commencing with the 1995–96 fiscal year, the auditor shall allocate property tax revenue to a qualifying county service area, as defined in subdivision (b), in those amounts that would be determined if the amount of the reduction calculated for that county service area pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 97.3 had been decreased by an amount that is equal to that fraction specified in paragraph (2) of the amount of revenue allocated to that county service
 area from the county’s Special District Augmentation Fund for police protection activities in the 1992–93 fiscal year.

(2) For purposes of implementing paragraph (1), the applicable fractions are as follows:

(A) For the 1995–96 fiscal year, one-third.

(B) For the 1996–97 fiscal year, two-thirds.

(C) For the 1997–98 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the entire amount.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualifying county service area” means a county service area that was formed prior to July 1, 1994, pursuant to the County Service Area Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 25210) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code) and that is either of the
 following:

(1) A county service area, the governing board of which is the board of supervisors, that is engaged in police protection activities, as reported to the Controller for inclusion in the 1989–90 Edition of the Financial Transactions Report Concerning Special Districts under the heading of “Police Protection and Public Safety.”

(2) A county service area, the sole purpose of which is to engage in police protection activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 158, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

97.44.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in the County of San Luis Obispo, commencing with ad valorem property tax revenue allocations for the 1995–96 fiscal year, the auditor shall, subject to subdivision (b), do both of the following:

(1) Allocate to the County of San Luis Obispo, from those revenues that are otherwise required to be allocated to the county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund (ERAF), that amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is
 attributable in the relevant fiscal year to three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,750,000) of ad valorem property tax revenue derived for the 1993–94 fiscal year from the taxation of property assessed by the County of San Luis Obispo for that fiscal year.

(2) Transfer from the county to that county’s ERAF that amount of revenue, otherwise to be allocated to the county pursuant to Section 100, that is attributable in the relevant fiscal year to three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,750,000) of ad valorem property tax revenue derived for the 1993–94 fiscal year with respect to the County of San Luis Obispo from the taxation of property assessed by the State Board of Equalization.

(b) The allocations and transfers of revenue required by subdivision (a) are modifications of, and shall not be construed to be substitutions for, the allocation of
 property tax revenues as otherwise required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 501, Sec. 4.   Effective October 4, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

97.45.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 and subdivision (d) of Section 97.3, the amount deposited in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to Section 33681.9 of the Health and Safety Code, if that section is added by Senate Bill 1045 of the 2003–04 Regular Session, shall be allocated as follows:

(a) To county offices, the amount that would be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 multiplied by
 1.85185.

(b) To community colleges, the amount that would be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 multiplied by 1.85185.

(c) To school districts the remainder after the allocations made in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 552, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

97.46.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 and subdivision (d) of Section 97.3, the revenue deposited in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to Section 33681.9 of the Health and Safety Code shall be allocated as follows:
